apertium-sl-es.sl.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>čČćĆžŽšŠđĐABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"        c="Noun / Samostalnik"/> 
    <sdef n="np"       c="Proper noun / Lastno ime"/> 
    <sdef n="num"      c="Numeral / Number / Števnik"/> 
    <sdef n="adj"      c="Adjective / Pridevnik"/> 
    <sdef n="adv"      c="Adverb / Prislov"/> 
    <sdef n="prn"      c="Pronoun / Zaimek"/> 
    <sdef n="pr"       c="Preposition / Predlog"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex"    c="Lexical verb / Glagol"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser"    c="The verb 'to be' / Glagol biti"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver"  c="The verb 'to have' / Glagol imeti"/> 
    <sdef n="vaux"     c="Auxilliary verb / Pomožni glagol"/> 
    <sdef n="vbmod"    c="Modal verb / Modalni glagol"/> 
    <sdef n="part"     c="Particle / Členek"/> 
    <sdef n="det"      c="Determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="ij"       c="Interjection / Medmet"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"   c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub"   c="Subordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv"   c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 

    <sdef n="imperf"   c="Imperfective - Nedovršni"/>
    <sdef n="perf"     c="Perfective - Dovršni"/>

    <sdef n="m"        c="Masculine / Moški spol"/> 
    <sdef n="f"        c="Feminine / Ženski spol"/> 
    <sdef n="nt"       c="Neuter / Srednji spol"/> 
    <sdef n="mf"       c="Masculine-Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="mfn"      c="Masculine-Feminine"/> 

    <sdef n="sg"       c="Singular / Ednina"/> 
    <sdef n="pl"       c="Plural / Množina"/> 
    <sdef n="du"       c="Dual / Dvojina"/> 
    <sdef n="sp"       c="Singular / Plural"/> 

    <sdef n="past"     c="Past tense / Preteklik"/> 
    <sdef n="pres"     c="Present tense / Sedanjik"/> 
    <sdef n="inf"      c="Infinitive / Nedoločnik"/> 
    <sdef n="supn"     c="Supine / Namenilnik"/> 
    <sdef n="cni"      c="Conditional / Pogojnik"/>
    <sdef n="fut"      c="Future / Prihodnik"/> 
    <sdef n="imp"      c="Imperative / Velelnik"/> 
    <sdef n="neg"      c="Negative / Nikalnik"/> 

    <sdef n="pp"       c="Past Participle / Deležnik (pretekli)"/> 
    <sdef n="pprs"     c="Present Participle / Deležnik (sedanji)"/> 

    <sdef n="p1"       c="First person / Prva oseba"/> 
    <sdef n="p2"       c="Second person / Druga oseba"/> 
    <sdef n="p3"       c="Third person / Tretja oseba"/> 

    <sdef n="gen"      c="Genitive / Rodilnik"/> 
    <sdef n="nom"      c="Nominative / Imenovalnik"/> 
    <sdef n="dat"      c="Dative / Dajalnik"/> 
    <sdef n="loc"      c="Locative / Mestnik"/> 
    <sdef n="acc"      c="Accusative / Tožilnik"/> 
    <sdef n="ins"      c="Instrumental / Orodnik"/> 
    <sdef n="voc"      c="Vocative"/> 

    <sdef n="ind"      c="Indefinite"/> 
    <sdef n="def"      c="Definite"/> 

    <sdef n="ref"      c="Reflexive"/> 
    <sdef n="enc"      c="Enclitic"/> 
    <sdef n="pro"      c="Proclitic"/> 
    <sdef n="qnt"      c="Quantifier"/> 
    <sdef n="ord"      c="Ordinal"/> 
    <sdef n="pers"     c="Personal / Osebni"/> 
    <sdef n="emph"     c="Emphatic"/> 
    <sdef n="pos"      c="Possessive / Svojilni"/> 
    <sdef n="rel"      c="Relative / Oziralnostni"/> 
    <sdef n="itg"      c="Interrogative / Vprašalni"/> 
    <sdef n="dem"      c="Demonstrative / Kazalni"/> 

    <sdef n="sint"     c="Synthetic adjective / Sintetični prislov"/> 
    <sdef n="pst"      c="Positive / Osnovnik"/> 
    <sdef n="comp"     c="Comparative / Primernik"/> 
    <sdef n="sup"      c="Superlative / Presežnik"/> 
    <sdef n="ela"      c="Elative / Elativ"/> 

    <sdef n="acr"      c="Acronym"/> 
    <sdef n="ant"      c="Antroponym / Imena"/> 
    <sdef n="cog"      c="Cognomen / Priimki"/> 
    <sdef n="top"      c="Toponym / Kraji"/> 
    <sdef n="al"       c="Other / Otros / Ostalo"/> 

    <sdef n="nn"       c="Inanimate / Neživo"/> 
    <sdef n="an"       c="Animate/inanimate"/> 
    <sdef n="aa"       c="Animate / Živo"/> 

    <sdef n="ma"       c="Masculine Animate / Moški spol - živo"/> 
    <sdef n="mi"       c="Masculine Inanimate / Moški spol - neživo"/>

    <sdef n="abbr"     c="Abbreviation"/> 
    <sdef n="pass"     c="Passive voice"/> 

    <sdef n="sent"     c="End of sentence"/> 
    <sdef n="cm"       c="Comma"/> 
    <sdef n="lpar"     c="Left parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="rpar"     c="Right parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="lquest"   c="Left question-mark"/> 
    <sdef n="apos"     c="Apostrophe"/> 

    <sdef n="posm"     c="Possessive form of masculine noun"/> 
    <sdef n="posf"     c="Possessive form of feminine noun"/> 
	
    <sdef n="ger"     c="Gerund"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <!-- Punctuation -->
    
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- Numerals -->
    
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- Prepositions -->
    
    <pardef n="s__pr">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- Conjunctions -->
    
    <pardef n="in__cnjcoo">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ki__cnjsub">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- Interjections -->
    
    <pardef n="hej__ij">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- Abbreviations -->
    
    <pardef n="km__abbr">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

	<e lm="brez">            <i>brez</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="čez">             <i>čez</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="čez">             <i>čez</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="čez">             <i>čez</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="do">              <i>do</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="do">              <i>do</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="do">              <i>do</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="h">               <i>h</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="h">               <i>h</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="iz">              <i>iz</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="iz">              <i>iz</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="izmed">           <i>izmed</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="izmed">           <i>izmed</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="iznad">           <i>iznad</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="izpod">           <i>izpod</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="izpred">          <i>izpred</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="izven">           <i>izven</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="izza">            <i>izza</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="k">               <i>k</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="k">               <i>k</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="kljub">           <i>kljub</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="kljub">           <i>kljub</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="med">             <i>med</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="med">             <i>med</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="med">             <i>med</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="mimo">            <i>mimo</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="nad">             <i>nad</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="nad">             <i>nad</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="na">              <i>na</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="na">              <i>na</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="namesto">         <i>namesto</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="naokoli">         <i>naokoli</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="nasproti">        <i>nasproti</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="navkljub">        <i>navkljub</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="navkljub">        <i>navkljub</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="navzlic">         <i>navzlic</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="ob">              <i>ob</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="ob">              <i>ob</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="ob">              <i>ob</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="od">              <i>od</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="od">              <i>od</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="o">               <i>o</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="okoli">           <i>okoli</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="okrog">           <i>okrog</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="onkraj">          <i>onkraj</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="pod">             <i>pod</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="pod">             <i>pod</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="po">              <i>po</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="po">              <i>po</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="poleg">           <i>poleg</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="povrh">           <i>povrh</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="pred">            <i>pred</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="prek">            <i>prek</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="pri">             <i>pri</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="proti">           <i>proti</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="proti">           <i>proti</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="skozi">           <i>skozi</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="skozi">           <i>skozi</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="skoz">            <i>skoz</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="spod">            <i>spod</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="sredi">           <i>sredi</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="v">               <i>v</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="v">               <i>v</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="vrh">             <i>vrh</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="vštric">          <i>vštric</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="za">              <i>za</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="za">              <i>za</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="za">              <i>za</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="zavoljo">         <i>zavoljo</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="zoper">           <i>zoper</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="razen">           <i>razen</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="če">              <i>če</i><par n="ki__cnjsub"/></e>
	<e lm="ker">             <i>ker</i><par n="ki__cnjsub"/></e>
	<e lm="kot">             <i>kot</i><par n="ki__cnjsub"/></e>
	<e lm="ki">              <i>ki</i><par n="ki__cnjsub"/></e>
	<e lm="a">               <i>a</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="a">               <i>a</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="ali">             <i>ali</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="ampak">           <i>ampak</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="bodisi">          <i>bodisi</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="čeprav">          <i>čeprav</i><par n="ki__cnjsub"/></e>
	<e lm="da">              <i>da</i><par n="ki__cnjsub"/></e>
	<e lm="in">              <i>in</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="kajti">           <i>kajti</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="ko">              <i>ko</i><par n="ki__cnjsub"/></e>
	<e lm="marveč">          <i>marveč</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="ne">              <i>ne</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="ne">              <i>ne</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="niti">            <i>niti</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="niti">            <i>niti</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="pa">              <i>pa</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="saj">             <i>saj</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="temveč">          <i>temveč</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="ter">             <i>ter</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="toda">            <i>toda</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="torej">           <i>torej</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="vendar">          <i>vendar</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="zakaj">           <i>zakaj</i><par n="in__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="hej">             <i>hej</i><par n="hej__ij"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
